Tennessee, session 114, SB0377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 56, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
4-56-201.
(a) This part is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee Procurement
Protection Act."
(b) The purpose of this act is to ensure that suppliers to the state and to political
subdivisions of this state are safe, reliable, and free from undue influence and control
from foreign adversaries.
4-56-202.
(a) As used in this part:
(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of finance and
administration;
(2) "Company" means a sole proprietorship, organization, association,
corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability
partnership, limited liability company, or other entity or business association,
including all wholly owned subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries, parent
companies, or affiliates of such entities or business associations, that exist for
the purpose of making profit;
(3) "Department" means the department of finance and administration;
SB0377
000405
- 1 -

(4) "Domicile" means the country in which a company is registered,
where the company's affairs are primarily completed, or where the majority of
ownership shares are held;
(5) "Foreign adversary" means a country designated by the United States
department of commerce under 15 CFR 791.4 on January 1, 2025, and as
amended thereafter; and
(6) "Foreign adversary company" means a company that:
(A) Is domiciled, incorporated, issued, or listed in a foreign
adversary;
(B) Is headquartered in a foreign adversary;
(C) Has its principal place of business in a foreign adversary;
(D) Is controlled by the government or an instrumentality thereof
of a foreign adversary; or
(E) Is majority-owned by an entity or is board-controlled by an
entity that is under the jurisdictional control of the government of a foreign
adversary.
(b) If a parent company does not meet the criteria in subdivision (a)(6) and does
not recognize more than fifty percent (50%) of the total annual global revenue of the
parent company and subsidiaries from China and Hong Kong combined, then the parent
company is not a foreign adversary company solely because one (1) or more
subsidiaries or affiliates meet the definition of a foreign adversary company.
4-56-203.
It is the policy of this state to:
- 2 - 000405

(1) Prohibit the public procurement of final products or services from a
foreign adversary company, whether those products or services are sold directly
by the foreign adversary company or through a third-party vendor; and
(2) Authorize the public procurement of products and services from a
company that has operations, affiliates, and subsidiaries in a foreign adversary
so long as the company is not a foreign adversary company.
4-56-204.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (e), a foreign adversary company is
prohibited from bidding on or submitting a proposal for a contract with a state agency or
political subdivision of this state for goods or services.
(b) For the purpose of complying with subsection (a), a company that offers to
provide final products or services to a state agency or a political subdivision of this state
that are manufactured or produced by a foreign adversary company under subsection
(a) shall, for the purposes of this section, be considered a foreign adversary company.
The restriction does not apply to products or services which have inputs from a foreign
adversary company but that are not final products of a foreign adversary company.
(c) A state agency or political subdivision of this state shall require a company
that submits a bid or proposal for a contract for goods or services to certify that the
company is not a foreign adversary company as described in subsection (b).
(d) If the commissioner determines that a company has submitted a false
certification under subsection (c) of this section:
(1) The company is liable for a civil penalty in an amount that is equal to
the greater of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or twice the amount
of the contract for which a bid or proposal was submitted.
- 3 - 000405

(2) The state agency or the department shall terminate the contract with
the company; and
(3) The company shall be prohibited from bidding on a state contract for
sixty (60) months.
(e) Notwithstanding the prohibitions in subsections (a) and (b), a state agency
may enter into a contract for goods or services produced by a foreign adversary
company if:
(1) There is no other reasonable option for procuring the good or service;
and
(2) The contract is pre-approved by the department after a determination
that not procuring the good or service would pose a greater threat to the state
than the threat associated with the good or service itself.
4-56-205.
If any provision of this part or its application to any person or circumstance is
held invalid, then the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act
that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end, the
provisions of this part are severable.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 000405